Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2016.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7(e)(8) of the act of October 17, 2008 (P.L.1645, No.132), known as the Home Improvement Consumer Protection Act, is amended to read:Section 7. Home improvement contracts.* * *(e) Voidable clauses.--If a home improvement contract contains any of the following clauses, the home improvement contract shall be voidable by the owner:* * *(8) A provision that [the contractor shall be awarded attorney fees and costs.] awards attorney fees and costs to a prevailing party in an action or arbitration unless the 12345678910111213141516171819 provision applies equally to both parties.* * *Section 2. The amendment of section 7(e)(8) of the act shall apply to home improvement contracts executed on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2016PN2570 - 2 - 123456